South Dakota, session 2026, HB1100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 40-15-37 be AMENDED:
40-15-37. The license and renewal fees and the inspection fees shall be paid by
the livestock auction agency to the Animal Industry Board and by it remitted to the state
treasurer within thirty days after receipt. The state treasurer shall issue a receipt for the
same to the Animal Industry Board.
The state treasurer shall credit ten percent of the amount received to a fund to be
known as the livestock disease emergency fund and shall distribute and apply such fund
as provided by law § 40-15-38.
The remaining ninety percent of the amount received shall be credited to a fund to
be known as the livestock auction market inspectors fund, all of which shall be distributed
and applied by the Animal Industry Board as compensation to the livestock auction market
inspectors on a monthly basis. Expenditures from the livestock auction market inspectors
fund must be appropriated in the general appropriation bill.
Section 2. That § 40-15-38 be AMENDED:
40-15-38. The Animal Industry Board shall deposit all funds collected by it to the
credit of a fund to be known as the livestock disease emergency fund in the Office of the
State Treasurer as provided by § 40-15-37. The livestock disease emergency fund shall
be is available for use to the Animal Industry Board only pursuant to a determination of
the Governor that an emergency exists and an order from the Governor authorizing the
use of said funds the moneys for the eradication and control of virulent diseases among
livestock:
(1) Livestock; and
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.657.29 2 1100
(2) Poultry.
Expenditures from the livestock disease emergency fund must be appropriated in
the general appropriation bill.
Section 3. That § 13-49-20.6 be REPEALED.
Notwithstanding the provisions of § 40-15-38, the Governor may utilize all funds
in excess of two hundred thousand dollars in the livestock disease emergency fund to
provide for reserved veterinary slots or grants in out-of-state schools as authorized in this
chapter.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.